Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5887.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 3015. (1) Subject to subsection (2), while an insured remains insured with the same insurer or an affiliate of the insurer, the insured's selected coverage level remains in effect for a policy issued or renewed after June 30, 2027 that provides any of the following: (a) Residual liability insurance required under sections 3009 and 3101. (b) Personal protection and property protection insurance required under chapter 31. (c) Uninsured and underinsured motorist coverage. (d) Comprehensive coverage. (e) Collision coverage, including coverage required to be offered under section 3037. (2) An effective selection of a coverage level for a type of automobile insurance listed in subsection (1) remains in effect until a policy is issued in accordance with a different effective selection by the insured. An insurer shall state, in a conspicuous manner, that a coverage level selection will remain in effect while the insured remains insured with the same insurer or an affiliate of the insurer unless the insured selects a different coverage option. (3) As used in this section, "affiliate of" means that term as defined in section 2102. Sec. 3109a. (1) An insurer that provides personal protection insurance benefits under this chapter may offer deductibles and exclusions reasonably related to other health and accident coverage on the insured. Any deductibles and exclusions offered under this section must be offered at a reduced premium that reflects reasonably anticipated reductions in losses, expenses, or both, are subject to prior approval by the director, and must apply only to benefits payable to the person named in the policy, the spouse of the insured, and any relative of either domiciled in the same household. (2) For an insurance policy issued or renewed after July 1, 2020, the before July 1, 2027, an insurer shall offer to an applicant or named insured that selects a personal protection benefit limit under section 3107c(1)(b) an exclusion related to qualified health coverage. All of the following apply to that exclusion: (a) If the named insured has qualified health coverage as defined in section 3107d(7)(b)(i) that will cover injuries that occur as the result of a motor vehicle accident and if the named insured's spouse and any relatives of either the named insured or the spouse domiciled in the same household have qualified health coverage that will cover injuries that occur as the result of a motor vehicle accident, the premium for the personal protection insurance benefits payable under section 3107(1)(a) under the policy must be reduced by 100%. (b) If a member, but not all members, of the household covered by the insurance policy has qualified health coverage that will cover injuries that occur as the result of a motor vehicle accident, the insurer shall offer a reduced premium that reflects reasonably anticipated reductions in losses, expenses, or both. The reduction must be in addition to the rate rollback required by section 2111f and the share of the premium reduction for the policy attributable to any person with qualified health coverage must be 100%. (c) Subject to subdivision (d), a person subject to an exclusion under this subsection is not eligible for personal protection benefits under the insurance policy. (d) If a person subject to an exclusion under this subsection is no longer covered by the qualified health coverage, the named insured shall notify the insurer that the named insured or resident relative is no longer eligible for an exclusion. All of the following apply under this subdivision: (i) The named insured shall, within not later than 30 days after the effective date of the termination of the qualified health coverage, obtain insurance that provides the security required under section 3101(1) 3101 that includes coverage that was excluded under this subsection. (ii) During the period described in subparagraph (i), if any person excluded suffers accidental bodily injury arising from a motor vehicle accident, the person is entitled to claim benefits under the assigned claims plan. (e) If the named insured does not obtain insurance that provides the security required under section 3101(1) 3101 that includes the coverage excluded under this subsection during the period described in subdivision (d)(i) and the named insured or any person excluded under the policy suffers accidental bodily injury arising from a motor vehicle accident, unless the injured person is entitled to coverage under some other policy, the injured person is not entitled to be paid personal protection insurance benefits under section 3107(1)(a) for the injury that occurred during the period in which coverage under this section was excluded. (3) An automobile insurer shall not refuse to prospectively insure, limit coverage available to, charge a reinstatement fee for, or increase the premiums for automobile insurance for an eligible person , as that term is defined in section 2103, solely because the person previously failed to obtain insurance that provides the security required under section 3101(1) 3101 in the time period provided under subsection (2)(d)(i). (4) The amount of a premium reduction under subsection (1) must appear in a conspicuous manner in the declarations for the policy, and be expressed as a dollar amount or a percentage. (5) Subsections (2) and (3) do not apply for an insurance policy issued or renewed after June 30, 2027. (6) (5) As used in this section: , (a) "Affiliate of" means that term as defined in section 2102. (b) "Eligible person" means that term as defined in section 2103(1). (c) "qualified "Qualified health coverage" means that term as defined in section 3107d. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) House Bill No. 5886 (request no. H01583'25). (b) House Bill No. 5889 (request no. H01583'25 g). (c) House Bill No. 5888 (request no. H05612'25).